Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.170

Violations constitute unfair practice.

Any violation of this chapter is declared to be an unfair act or practice or unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce for the purpose of application of the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1981 c 155 s 20.]